Hawaii, session 2025, SB1127.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds and declares that the issuance of special purpose revenue bonds under this Act is in the public interest and for the public health, safety, and general welfare. SECTION 2. Pursuant to part II, chapter 39A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, the department of budget and finance, with the approval of the governor, is authorized to issue special purpose revenue bonds in a total amount not to exceed $80,000,000, in one or more series, for the purpose of assisting West Hawaii Community Health Center, Inc., a Hawaiʻi nonprofit corporation doing business as Hawaii Island Community Health Center, in financing the costs of purchasing or leasing land and designing, constructing, improving, purchasing, and equipping primary care health care facilities on the island of Hawaiʻi, including costs to: (1)  Purchase or lease of land and design, construct, furnish, and equip, including information technology equipment and solar panels, for a 45,000 square feet medical, dental, behavioral health, pharmacy, specialty care campus to serve the residents of Kailua-Kona; (2)  Design, renovate, furnish, and equip, including information technology equipment and solar panels, a 10,000 square feet facility owned by Hawaii Island Community Health Center in downtown Hilo, transforming the facility from administrative space to a one-stop primary health care facility for women's health, pediatric care, and family medicine; (3)  Purchase or lease land, and design, construct, furnish, and equip, including information technology equipment and solar panels, a new 10,000 square feet primary health care facility to serve the residents of Pahoa and surrounding communities in the Puna District; (4)  Design, renovate, furnish, and equip a 3,600 square feet building owned by Hawaii Island Community Health Center to house health care workers working at the Hawaii Island Community Health Center medical and dental clinic located in Naʻalehu, located in the Kaʻu District; and (5)  Other related expansion projects. The legislature hereby finds and determines that the purchase or lease of land and the design, construction, improvement, purchase, and equipping of primary care health care facilities on the island of Hawaiʻi by Hawaii Island Community Health Center constitute a project as defined in part II, chapter 39A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, and the financing thereof is assistance to a not-for-profit corporations that provide health care facilities to the general public. SECTION 3. The special purpose revenue bonds and the refunding special purpose revenue bonds issued under this Act shall be issued pursuant to part II, chapter 39A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, relating to the power to issue special purpose revenue bonds to assist not-for-profit corporations that provide health care facilities to the general public. SECTION 4. The department of budget and finance is authorized, from time to time, including times subsequent to June 30, 2030, to issue special purpose revenue bonds in whatever principal amounts the department shall determine to be necessary to refund the special purpose revenue bonds authorized in section 2 and to refund special purpose revenue bonds authorized in this section, regardless of whether the outstanding special purpose revenue bonds or refunding special purpose revenue bonds have matured or are the subject of redemption or whether the refunding special purpose revenue bonds shall be bonds for the multi-project programs described in section 2.  In making this determination, the department shall comply with federal law relating to the exemption from federal income taxation of the interest on bonds of the nature authorized by this section. SECTION 5. The authorization to issue special purpose revenue bonds under this Act shall lapse on June 30, 2030. SECTION 6. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________